Utah statutes.
36-11-305.   Campaign contribution during session prohibited.
(1)  It is unlawful for a person, lobbyist, principal, or political committee
to make a campaign contribution or contract, promise, or agree to make a
campaign contribution to a legislator or a legislator's personal campaign
committee, or a political action committee controlled by a legislator during
the time the Legislature is convened in annual general or veto override
session, or in a special session convened before July 1 of a general election
year.
(2)   It is unlawful for a person, lobbyist, principal, or political committee
to make a campaign contribution, or contract, promise, or agree to make a
campaign contribution, to the governor, the governor's personal campaign
committee, or a political action committee controlled by the governor during
the time the Legislature is convened in annual general or veto override
session, during a special session convened before July 1 of a general election
year, or during the time period established by the Utah Constitution, Article
VII, Section 8, for the governor to approve or veto bills passed by the
Legislature in the annual general session.
(3)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
